Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF968.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2101YH (7) 91 ss/ns H.F. 968 Section 1. LICENSURE FEE STANDARDIZATION. 1 1. The department of inspections, appeals, and licensing 2 shall consult with the boards, commissions, committees, 3 councils, and other entities of state government identified in 4 the licensure renewal and fee study issued by the department of 5 inspections, appeals, and licensing pursuant to 2024 Iowa Acts, 6 chapter 1170, sections 67 and 68, to propose uniform licensure 7 fees for each license in a tier. 8 2. Not later than eighteen months after the effective 9 date of this Act, the department of inspections, appeals, and 10 licensing shall submit a regulatory analysis of proposed rules 11 to the administrative code editor pursuant to section 17A.4A, 12 subsection 4, as necessary to implement a uniform licensure 13 fee proposed for licenses in applicable tiers, provided the 14 department or an entity under the purview of the department is 15 otherwise authorized by law to determine the fee by rule. 16 3. For purposes of this section, âlicenseâ means a license, 17 permit, or certification. 18